California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Hercules as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 1.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.13, commencing with Section 7287.17.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.14. County of Santa Barbara Transactions and Use Tax [7287.18. - 7287.18.]

7287.18.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Santa Barbara may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes to support countywide programs at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The Santa Barbara County Board of Supervisors adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with Article XIII C of the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in
 the County of Santa Barbara as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 2.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.14, commencing with Section 7287.18.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.15. City of Carpinteria Transactions and Use Tax [7287.19. - 7287.19.]

7287.19.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Carpinteria, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.25 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Carpinteria adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Carpinteria as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 3.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.15, commencing with Section 7287.19.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.16. City of Santa Maria Transactions and Use Tax [7287.20. - 7287.20.]

7287.20.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Santa Maria, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Santa Maria adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Santa Maria as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 4.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.16, commencing with Section 7287.20.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.18. County of Contra Costa Transactions and Use Tax [7287.22. - 7287.22.]

7287.22.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Contra Costa, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.625 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed pursuant to Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The board of supervisors of the County of Contra Costa adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the County of Contra Costa as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 11, Sec. 2.   (AB 1768)   Effective June 1, 2026.   Repealed conditionally on December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.18, commencing with Section 7287.22.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.2. City of Palo Alto Transactions and Use Tax [7287.24. - 7287.24.]

7287.24.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Palo Alto, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Palo Alto adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Palo Alto as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 5.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.2, commencing with Section 7287.24.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.21. City of Los Altos Transactions and Use Tax [7287.25. - 7287.25.]

7287.25.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Los Altos, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Los Altos adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Los Altos as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 6.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.21, commencing with Section 7287.25.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.22. City of Santa Rosa Transactions and Use Tax [7287.26. - 7287.26.]

7287.26.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Santa Rosa, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Santa Rosa adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Santa Rosa as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 7.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.22, commencing with Section 7287.26.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.23. City of Rohnert Park Transactions and Use Tax [7287.27. - 7287.27.]

7287.27.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Rohnert Park, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.75 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Rohnert Park adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Rohnert Park as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be
 repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 8.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.23, commencing with Section 7287.27.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.24. Town of Los Gatos Transactions and Use Tax [7287.28. - 7287.28.]

7287.28.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Town of Los Gatos, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The town council of the Town of Los Gatos adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the Town of Los Gatos as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 9.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.24, commencing with Section 7287.28.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.25. City of Pacifica Transactions and Use Tax [7287.29. - 7287.29.]

7287.29.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Pacifica, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of Pacifica adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to
 the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of Pacifica as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 10.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.25, commencing with Section 7287.29.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.26. City of San Gabriel Transactions and Use Tax [7287.30. - 7287.30.]

7287.30.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of San Gabriel, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of San Gabriel adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of San Gabriel as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 11.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.26, commencing with Section 7287.30.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.27. City of San Pablo Transactions and Use Tax [7287.31. - 7287.31.]

7287.31.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of San Pablo, by ordinance, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city council of the City of San Pablo adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(c) If, as of December 31, 2031, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the City of San Pablo as authorized by subdivision (a), this chapter shall be repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2026, Ch. 109, Sec. 12.   (SB 762)   Effective August 17, 2026.   Conditionally repealed as of December 31, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.27, commencing with Section 7287.31.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Local Public Finance [7288.1. - 7288.6.]

7288.1.

A local public finance authority shall be established for the purpose of financing drug abuse prevention, crime prevention, health care services, and public education in any county if either, or both, of the following occur:

(a) The county board of supervisors adopts a resolution declaring its intent to propose an increase in the transactions and use tax in the county pursuant to this chapter. 

(b) The county superintendent of schools receives resolutions from a majority of the governing boards of the school districts in the
 county declaring their intent to propose an increase in the transactions and use tax in the county pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1024, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1992.   See Section 7288.6 for restriction on operative date of tax.)
-------------------------------------------

7288.2.

The local public finance authority shall be governed by a board of directors. The board of directors shall consist of the following members:

(a) Five members of the county boards of supervisors. 

(b) Five members of governing boards of school districts in the county.

(1) Governing board members shall be selected in a manner determined by the county board of education, provided that: 

(A) If there
 are five or more school districts in the county, no school district shall have more than one member on the board of directors. 

(B) If there are fewer than five school districts in the county, each school district shall have at least one member on the board of directors. 

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, the county office of education shall be deemed to be a school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1024, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1992.   See Section 7288.6 for restriction on operative date of tax.)
-------------------------------------------

7288.3.

A local public finance authority may adopt an ordinance imposing, for the authority’s general purpose, a transactions and use tax that conforms with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) at a rate of 0.25 percent, or a multiple thereof, if all of the following requirements are met:

(a) The ordinance specifies how the proceeds of the tax will be allocated among drug abuse prevention, crime prevention, health care services, and public education purposes. Funds allocated for public education
 purposes shall be governed by Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 42400) of Part 24 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Education Code.

(b) The ordinance proposing the tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of the board of directors of the authority, provided that the two-thirds majority includes at least three of the members described in subdivision (a) of Section 7288.2, and at least three of the members described in subdivision (b) of Section 7288.2. 

(c) The ordinance proposing the tax is approved by two-thirds of the qualified voters of the county voting on the measure.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1024) by Stats. 2001, Ch. 251, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2002.   See Section 7288.6 for restriction on operative date of tax.)
-------------------------------------------

7288.4.

(a) A local public finance authority may exercise all powers necessary to perform the collection, administration, and allocation duties with respect to the transactions and use tax in a manner consistent with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251). 

(b) With respect to the approval by the voters of an ordinance specified in Section 7288.3, if the ordinance so requests, the county shall call a special election for that purpose to be held on a date not less than 88 nor more than 103 days after the ordinance is adopted by the board of directors of the local public
 finance authority. 

(c) The county shall be reimbursed by the local public finance authority for all costs of conducting elections for purposes of imposing a transactions and use tax pursuant to this chapter. In the event the ordinance imposing the tax is adopted by the voters, the costs of conducting the election may be reimbursed from the proceeds of the tax. In the event the ordinance imposing the tax is not adopted by the voters, the costs of conducting the election shall be reimbursed by the local agencies within the county in proportion to the revenues each agency would have received if the ordinance had been adopted, during the first year following adoption of the ordinance. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the imposition and collection of any tax approved by the voters at an election held pursuant to this chapter shall commence no sooner than the first day
 of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 90 days after the election results are certified by the county registrar.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1024, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1992.   See Section 7288.6 for restriction on operative date of tax.)
-------------------------------------------

7288.5.

For purposes of this chapter, a “school district” includes a community college district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1024, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1992.   See Section 7288.6 for restriction on operative date of tax.)
-------------------------------------------

7288.6.

No tax imposed pursuant to this chapter shall become operative before the later of the following dates:

(a) January 1, 1993. 

(b) The date that Sections 6051.5 and 6201.5 cease to be operative pursuant to those sections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1024, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.6. Davis Transactions and Use Tax [7290. - 7290.]

7290.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), the City of Davis may levy a transactions and use tax at a rate of 0.25 percent or 0.5 percent, if an ordinance proposing that tax is approved by a two-thirds vote of all of the members of the city council and the tax is approved by either a two-thirds or a majority vote of qualified voters of the city voting in an election on the issue, as determined by the ordinance proposing the tax and establishing how the revenues derived from the tax shall be expended.

(b) Any transactions and use tax imposed pursuant to this section shall be levied in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251).

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 330, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.65. Solano County Transactions and Use Tax [7290.5. - 7290.5.]

7290.5.

(a) (1) Upon meeting the requirements of subdivision (b), the Solano Transportation Improvement Agency, a local transportation authority so designated by the board of supervisors for the County of Solano pursuant to the Local Transportation Authority and Improvement Act (Division 19 (commencing with Section 180000) of the Public Utilities Code) and consistent with that act, may impose a transactions and use tax at a rate not to exceed 1 percent applicable
 to any one of the following areas:

(A) The Cities of Benicia and Vallejo.

(B) The Cities of Benicia and Vallejo and the entire unincorporated area of the County of Solano.

(C) The Cities of Fairfield and Suisun.

(D) The Cities of Fairfield and Suisun and the entire unincorporated area of the County of Solano.

(2) The Solano Transportation Improvement Agency shall not impose multiple transactions and use taxes pursuant to this section on any city or the unincorporated area of the County of Solano.

(b) Before imposing a transactions and use tax pursuant to this section, the Solano Transportation Improvement Agency shall meet
 all of the following requirements:

(1) The Solano Transportation Improvement Agency shall adopt an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax subject to any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax shall be submitted to the electorate and approved by the voters voting on the ordinance pursuant to Article XIIIC of the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax shall conform to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)).

(4) The Solano Transportation Improvement Agency shall determine the area, as described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), to which the tax would apply before the electors vote on the measure.

(c) The revenues derived from the tax shall be spent within, or for the benefit of, the area to which the tax applies, and shall be spent only on transportation and transit infrastructure and services.

(d) Any revenues derived from the tax shall supplement, and not supplant, other transportation and transit infrastructure and service revenues available to the area to which the tax applies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 758, Sec. 13.   (AB 1413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.73. Local Government Finance in the County of Alameda [7292.2. - 7292.3.]

7292.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Alameda may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes to support countywide programs at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all
 of the following requirements are met:

(1) The county adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance pursuant to Article XIIIC of the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, neither of the following shall be considered for purposes of the rate limit established by that section:

(A) A transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(B) A transactions and use tax rate imposed by the County of Alameda pursuant to authority previously granted by Chapter 327 of the Statutes of 2011, as amended by Chapter 194 of the Statutes of 2013.

(2) This subdivision does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 747, Sec. 3.   (AB 723)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Repealed conditionally on December 31, 2022, pursuant to Section 7292.3.)
-------------------------------------------

7292.3.

If, as of December 31, 2022, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the County of Alameda as required by subdivision (b) of Section 7292.2, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 651, Sec. 3.   (SB 703)   Effective January 1, 2018.   Repealed conditionally on December 31, 2022, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.73, commencing with Section 7292.2.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.74. Local Government Finance in the County of Santa Clara [7292.4. - 7292.41.]

7292.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Santa Clara may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes to support countywide programs at a rate of no more than 0.625 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The county adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted
 to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance pursuant to Article XIIIC of the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   (SB 335)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed conditionally on December 31, 2028, pursuant to Sec. 7292.41.)
-------------------------------------------

7292.41.

If, as of December 31, 2028, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax has not been approved in the County of Santa Clara as required by subdivision (a) of Section 7292.4, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 391, Sec. 1.   (SB 335)   Effective January 1, 2024.   Repealed conditionally on December 31, 2028, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.74, commencing with Section 7292.4.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.74.1. Local Government Finance in the City of Campbell Transactions and Use Tax [7292.42. - 7292.43.]

7292.42.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Campbell, by ordinance or by citizens’ initiative, may impose a transactions and use tax for general or specific purposes at a rate of no more than 0.5 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251), exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The City Council of the City of Campbell adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by the applicable voting approval requirement. This paragraph shall not apply to a tax imposed by citizens’ initiative.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance by the applicable voting approval requirement in accordance with the California Constitution.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, a transactions and use tax rate imposed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limitation established by Section 7251.1.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 1.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 7292.43.)
-------------------------------------------

7292.43.

If, as of January 1, 2029, an ordinance or citizens’ initiative proposing a transactions and use tax is not approved pursuant to Section 7292.42, this chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 852, Sec. 1.   (AB 3259)   Effective September 28, 2024.   Conditionally repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.74.1, commencing with Section 7292.42.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.75. Local Government Finance in the City of Alameda [7292.5. - 7292.6.]

7292.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the City of Alameda may impose a transactions and use tax for general purposes that, in combination with all taxes imposed pursuant to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), would not exceed the limit established in Section 7251.1 by more than 0.5 percent, if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) The city adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax subject to any applicable voter approval requirement.

(2) The ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax is submitted to the electorate and is approved by the voters voting on the ordinance pursuant to Article XIIIC of the California Constitution. The election on the ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax may occur after January 1, 2017.

(3) The transactions and use tax conforms to the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)) other than Section 7251.1.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 7251.1, the tax rate authorized in subdivision (a) shall not be considered for purposes of the combined rate limit established by that section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 7292.6.)
-------------------------------------------

7292.6.

If, as of January 1, 2025, an ordinance proposing a transactions and use tax pursuant to this chapter has not been approved as required by paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 7292.5, this chapter shall be repealed as of that same date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2016, Ch. 502, Sec. 1.   (AB 366)   Effective January 1, 2017.   Repealed conditionally on January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 3.75, commencing with Section 7292.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.76. Sonoma County Transactions and Use Tax [7292.8. - 7292.8.]

7292.8.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the County of Sonoma may impose a transactions and use tax or combination of transactions and use taxes for general or specific purposes at a combined rate totaling no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established by Section 7251.1.

(2) Notwithstanding any other law, any city within the County of Sonoma may impose a transactions and use tax or combination of
 transactions and use taxes for general or specific purposes, at a combined rate totaling no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established by Section 7251.1.

 (3) Notwithstanding any other law, the Sonoma County Transportation Authority may impose a transactions and use tax or combination of transactions and use taxes for specific purposes, at a combined rate totaling no more than 1 percent that would, in combination with all taxes imposed in accordance with the Transactions and Use Tax Law (Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251)), exceed the limit established by Section 7251.1.

(b) An ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall meet all of the following requirements: 

(1) The County of Sonoma, a city within the county, or the Sonoma County Transportation Authority adopts an ordinance proposing the transactions and use tax by any applicable voting approval requirement.
